Nebraska, session 109, LB533.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB533 LB533
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 44-4601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
44-4601 Sections 44-4601 to 44-4612 and section 3 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and
Regulation Act.
Sec. 2. Section 44-4603, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
44-4603 For purposes of the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Licensure and
Regulation Act:
(1) Auditing entity means a pharmacy benefit manager or any person
that represents a pharmacy benefit manager in conducting an audit for
compliance with a contract between the pharmacy benefit manager and a
pharmacy;
(2) Claims processing service means an administrative service
performed in connection with the processing and adjudicating of a claim
relating to a pharmacist service that includes:
(a) Receiving a payment for a pharmacist service; or
(b) Making a payment to a pharmacist or pharmacy for a pharmacist
service;
(3) Clinician-administered drug means an outpatient prescription
drug other than a vaccine that:
(a) Cannot reasonably be self-administered by the covered person to
whom the drug is prescribed or by an individual assisting the covered
person with self-administration; and
(b) Is typically administered:
(i) By a health care provider authorized to administer the drug,
including when acting under a physician's delegation and supervision; and
(ii) In a physician's office, hospital outpatient infusion center,
or other clinical setting;
(4) (3) Covered person means a member, policyholder, subscriber,
enrollee, beneficiary, dependent, or other individual participating in a
-2-

LB533 LB533
2025 2025
health benefit plan;
(5) (4) Director means the Director of Insurance;
(6) (5) Health benefit plan means a policy, contract, certificate,
plan, or agreement entered into, offered, or issued by a health carrier
or self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by
federal law to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any
of the costs of a physical, mental, or behavioral health care service;
(7) (6) Health carrier has the same meaning as in section 44-1303;
(8) (7) Other prescription drug or device service means a service
other than a claims processing service, provided directly or indirectly,
whether in connection with or separate from a claims processing service,
including, but not limited to:
(a) Negotiating a rebate, discount, or other financial incentive or
arrangement with a drug company;
(b) Disbursing or distributing a rebate;
(c) Managing or participating in an incentive program or arrangement
for a pharmacist service;
(d) Negotiating or entering into a contractual arrangement with a
pharmacist or pharmacy;
(e) Developing and maintaining a formulary;
(f) Designing a prescription benefit program; or
(g) Advertising or promoting a service;
(9) (8) Pharmacist has the same meaning as in section 38-2832;
(10) (9) Pharmacist service means a product, good, or service or any
combination thereof provided as a part of the practice of pharmacy;
(11) (10) Pharmacy has the same meaning as in section 71-425;
(12)(a) (11)(a) Pharmacy benefit manager means a person, business,
or entity, including a wholly or partially owned or controlled subsidiary
of a pharmacy benefit manager, that provides a claims processing service
or other prescription drug or device service for a health benefit plan to
a covered person who is a resident of this state; and
-3-

LB533 LB533
2025 2025
(b) Pharmacy benefit manager does not include:
(i) A health care facility licensed in this state;
(ii) A health care professional licensed in this state;
(iii) A consultant who only provides advice as to the selection or
performance of a pharmacy benefit manager; or
(iv) A health carrier to the extent that it performs any claims
processing service or other prescription drug or device service
exclusively for its enrollees; and
(13) (12) Plan sponsor has the same meaning as in section 44-2702;
and .
(14) Specialty pharmacy means a pharmacy that specializes in
dispensing drugs for patients with rare or complex medical conditions.
Sec. 3. (1) A specialty pharmacy that ships a clinician-
administered drug to a health care provider or pharmacy shall:
(a) Comply with all federal laws regulating the shipment of drugs,
including, but not limited to, general chapter 800 of the United States
Pharmacopeia;
(b) In response to questions from a health care provider or
pharmacy, provide access to a pharmacist or nurse employed by the
specialty pharmacy twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week;
(c) Allow a covered person and health care provider to request a
refill of a clinician-administered drug on behalf of a covered person in
accordance with the pharmacy benefit manager's or health carrier's
utilization review procedures; and
(d) Adhere to the track and trace requirements, as described in the
federal Drug Supply Chain Security Act, 21 U.S.C. 360eee et seq., for a
clinician-administered drug that needs to be compounded or manipulated.
(2) For any clinician-administered drug dispensed by a specialty
pharmacy selected by the pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier, the
requesting health care provider or the provider's designee shall provide
the requested date, approximate time, and place of delivery of a
-4-

LB533 LB533
2025 2025
clinician-administered drug at least five business days before the date
of delivery. The specialty pharmacy shall require a signature upon
receipt of the shipment when shipped to a health care provider.
(3) A pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier that requires
dispensing of a clinician-administered drug through a specialty pharmacy
shall establish and disclose a process which allows the health care
provider or pharmacy to appeal and have exceptions to the use of a
specialty pharmacy when:
(a) A drug is not delivered as specified in subsection (2) of this
section; or
(b) An attending health care provider reasonably believes a covered
person may experience immediate and irreparable harm without the
immediate, one-time use of a clinician-administered drug that a health
care provider or pharmacy has in stock.
(4) A pharmacy benefit manager or health carrier shall not require a
specialty pharmacy to dispense a clinician-administered drug directly to
a covered person with the intention that the covered person will
transport the clinician-administered drug to a health care provider for
administration.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 5. Original sections 44-4601 and 44-4603, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-